District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

1-333.04

Agents of the Director of the Department of General Services.

Repealed.

History

May 26, 1908, 35 Stat. 274, ch. 198
April 12, 1997, D.C. Law 11-259, § 401, 44 DCR 1423

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-365.
1973 Ed., § 1-305.